Illinois, session 104th, HB3390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-801 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-801)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-801)7    Sec. 3-801. Registration. 8    (a) Except as provided herein for new residents, every 9owner of any vehicle which shall be operated upon the public 10highways of this State shall, within 24 hours after becoming 11the owner or at such time as such vehicle becomes subject to 12registration under the provisions of this Act, file in an 13office of the Secretary of State, an application for 14registration properly completed and executed. New residents 15need not secure registration until 30 days after establishing 16residency in this State, provided the vehicle is properly 17registered in another jurisdiction. By the expiration of such 1830-day statutory grace period, a new resident shall comply 19with the provisions of this Act and apply for Illinois vehicle 20registration. All applications for registration shall be 21accompanied by all documentation required under the provisions 22of this Act. The appropriate registration fees and taxes 23provided for in this Article of this Chapter shall be paid to   HB3390- 2 -LRB104 09256 LNS 19314 b1the Secretary of State with the application for registration 2of vehicles subject to registration under this Act.3    (b) Any resident of this State, who has been serving as a 4member or as a civilian employee of the United States Armed 5Services, or as a civilian employee of the United States 6Department of Defense, outside of the State of Illinois, need 7not secure registration until 45 days after returning to this 8State, provided the vehicle displays temporary military 9registration.10    (b-5) Any resident of this State who served in combat as a 11member of the United States Armed Services may have the 12registration fee waived for one license plate each year. 13    (c) When an application is submitted by mail, the 14applicant may not submit cash or postage stamps for payment of 15fees or taxes due. The Secretary in his discretion, may 16decline to accept a personal or company check or electronic 17payment in payment of fees or taxes. An application submitted 18to a dealer, or a remittance made to the Secretary of State 19shall be deemed in compliance with this Section.20(Source: P.A. 99-118, eff. 1-1-16; 99-324, eff. 1-1-16; 2199-642, eff. 7-28-16.)